Arkansas, session 2025, HB1152.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES - OPERATIONS. There is hereby established
for the Department of Education - Division of Public School Academic
Facilities and Transportation for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following
maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) N015N ADE DIR PUB SCHOOL FACIL & TRANS 1 GRADE SE01
(2) N046N ADE ASST DIR ACADEMIC FACILITIES 1 GRADE GS14
*KMW008*
01/16/2025 9:01:36 AM KMW008

HB1152
(3) G051C ADE ACADEMIC FACIL SR PROJECT ADMIN 2 GRADE GS10
(4) G075C ADE PROGRAM ADMINISTRATOR 1 GRADE GS10
(5) E016C PUBLIC SCHOOL PROGRAM COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS10
(6) G090C ADE AREA PROJECT MANAGER 12 GRADE GS09
(7) G039C SENIOR TRANSPORTATION MANAGER 1 GRADE GS09
(8) C037C ADMINISTRATIVE ANALYST 1 GRADE GS06
(9) A074C FISCAL SUPPORT SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS06
(10) S028C SCHOOL BUS DRIVER TRAINER 3 GRADE GS05
(11) X116C SCHOOL BUS TRANS INSPECTOR 6 GRADE GS05
(12) C056C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST III 1 GRADE GS04
(13) C073C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST II 1 GRADE GS03
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 32

SECTION 2. EXTRA HELP - OPERATIONS. There is hereby authorized, for
the Department of Education - Division of Public School Academic Facilities
and Transportation for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum
number of part-time or temporary employees, to be known as "Extra Help",
payable from funds appropriated herein for such purposes: five (5) temporary
or part-time employees, when needed, at rates of pay not to exceed those
provided in the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, or its
successor, or this act for the appropriate classification.

SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - OPERATIONS. There is hereby appropriated,
to the Department of Education, to be payable from the Division of Public
School Academic Facilities and Transportation Fund Account, for personal
services and operating expenses of the Department of Education - Division of
Public School Academic Facilities and Transportation - Operations for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $1,824,466
(02) EXTRA HELP 2,500
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 684,412
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 319,311
01/16/2025 9:01:36 AM KMW008

HB1152
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 24,650
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(05) SAFETY TRAINING 207,500
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $3,062,839

SECTION 4. APPROPRIATION - PROGRAMS OF THE DIVISION OF PUBLIC SCHOOL
ACADEMIC FACILITIES AND TRANSPORTATION. There is hereby appropriated, to the
Department of Education, to be payable from the Educational Facilities
Partnership Fund Account, for grants and aid and special programs providing
academic school facility and transportation assistance to the public school
districts of the Department of Education - Division of Public School Academic
Facilities and Transportation for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) ACADEMIC FACILITIES PARTNERSHIP $211,828,951
(02) ACADEMIC EQUIPMENT 0
(03) ACADEMIC FACILITIES CATASTROPHIC 3,511,538
(04) ACADEMIC FACILITIES EXTRAORDINARY
CIRCUMSTANCES PROGRAM 0
(05) ACADEMIC FACILITIES HIGH GROWTH 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $215,340,489

SECTION 5. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS CODE
NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. TRANSFER
AUTHORITY - OPEN-ENROLLMENT PUBLIC CHARTER SCHOOL FACILITIES LOAN PROGRAM.
The Department of Education - Division of Public School Academic Facilities
and Transportation is authorized to transfer any funds that are made
available for the Open-Enrollment Public Charter School Facilities Loan
Program, including funds from the Development and Enhancement Fund or its
successor fund or fund accounts, to the Open-Enrollment Public Charter School
Facilities Loan Fund.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
01/16/2025 9:01:36 AM KMW008

HB1152
2025 through June 30 2025 2026.

SECTION 6. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE
ARKANSAS CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
TRANSFER AUTHORITY. The Director of the Department of Education – Division of
Public School Academic Facilities and Transportation, with the approval of
the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State and after approval by the Arkansas
Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee, is hereby authorized to
request necessary appropriation transfers and any other budget related
adjustments necessary only for the appropriations authorized in this Act.
Furthermore, it is the intent of the General Assembly that the Department of
Education - Division of Public School Academic Facilities and Transportation
be able to make use of additional contractual services as necessary and that
transfers between line items and among appropriations are anticipated to
accomplish those purposes. Provided, however, that the Department of
Education - Division of Public School Academic Facilities and Transportation
shall be limited to submitting no more than two transfer requests during any
fiscal year.
Determining the maximum number of employees and the maximum amount of
appropriation and general revenue funding for a state agency each fiscal year
is the prerogative of the General Assembly. This is usually accomplished by
delineating such maximums in the appropriation act(s) for a state agency and
the general revenue allocations authorized for each fund and fund account by
amendment to the Revenue Stabilization law. Further, the General Assembly
has determined that the Department of Education – Division of Public School
Academic Facilities and Transportation may operate more efficiently if some
flexibility is provided to the Director of the Department of Education –
Division of Public School Academic Facilities and Transportation authorizing
broad powers under the Transfer Authority provision herein. Therefore, it is
both necessary and appropriate that the General Assembly maintain oversight
by requiring prior approval of the Legislative Council or Joint Budget
Committee as provided by this section. The requirement of approval by the
Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee is not a severable part of this
section. If the requirement of approval by the Legislative Council or Joint
Budget Committee is ruled unconstitutional by a court of competent
jurisdiction, this entire section is void.
01/16/2025 9:01:36 AM KMW008

HB1152
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 7. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors, and other fiscal
control laws of this State, where applicable, and regulations promulgated by
the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized by law, shall be
strictly complied with in disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 8. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 9. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the General
Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the
appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.



01/16/2025 9:01:36 AM KMW008